Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 10. GENERAL GOVERNMENT

SUBTITLE F. STATE AND LOCAL CONTRACTS AND FUND MANAGEMENT

CHAPTER 2265. REQUIRED PUBLICATION AND REPORTING BY GOVERNMENTAL ENTITIES

Sec. 2265.001. RECORDING AND REPORTING OF ELECTRICITY, WATER, AND NATURAL GAS CONSUMPTION. (a) In this section, "governmental entity" means:

(1) a board, commission, or department of the state or a political subdivision of the state, including a municipality, a county, or any kind of district other than a school district; or

(2) an institution of higher education as defined by Section 61.003, Education Code.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, a governmental entity responsible for payments for electric, water, or natural gas utility services shall record in an electronic repository the governmental entity's metered amount of electricity, water, or natural gas consumed for which it is responsible to pay and the aggregate costs for those utility services. The governmental entity shall report the recorded information on a publicly accessible Internet website with an interface designed for ease of navigation if available, or at another publicly accessible location.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 939 (H.B. 3693), Sec. 8, eff. September 1, 2007.

Renumbered from Government Code, Section 2264.001 by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 87 (S.B. 1969), Sec. 27.001(48), eff. September 1, 2009.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 597 (S.B. 668), Sec. 1.13, eff. June 10, 2019.